Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-811.02
Judicial nominating commission; send report to State Court Administrator; contents.

Within thirty days after the list of nominees for a judicial vacancy is presented to the Governor by a judicial nominating commission, the chairperson of the commission shall prepare and send to the State Court Administrator a report containing the following:

(1) Names of all candidates for the judicial vacancy;

(2) Copies of all applications submitted by candidates; and

(3) The names of the candidates nominated for the judicial vacancy.

Such report shall be available to the public and shall be preserved by the State Court Administrator for ten years.

Laws 1980, LB 730, § 6.